Illinois, session 104th, HB4473.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act is 5amended by changing Sections 3 and 6 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 15/3)  (from Ch. 85, par. 5953)7    Sec. 3. As used in this Act, unless the context clearly 8indicates otherwise: 9    "Agency" means the Illinois Environmental Protection 10Agency.11    "Composting" means the biological process by which 12microorganisms decompose the organic fraction of waste, 13producing a humus-like material that may be used as a soil 14conditioner.15    "County" means any county of the State and includes the 16City of Chicago.17    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 18Opportunity.19    "Municipal waste" means garbage, general household, 20institutional and commercial waste, industrial lunchroom or 21office waste, landscape waste, and construction and demolition 22debris.23    "Person" means any individual, partnership, cooperative   HB4473- 2 -LRB104 15586 BDA 28753 b1enterprise, unit of local government, institution, corporation 2or agency, or any other legal entity whatsoever which is 3recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.4    "Recycling, reclamation or reuse" means a method, 5technique or process designed to remove any contaminant from 6waste so as to render the waste reusable, or any process by 7which materials that would otherwise be disposed of or 8discarded are collected, separated or processed and returned 9to the economic mainstream in the form of raw materials or 10products.11    "Recycling center" means a facility that accepts only 12segregated, nonhazardous, nonspecial, homogeneous, 13nonputrescible materials, such as dry paper, glass, cans or 14plastics, for subsequent use in the secondary materials 15market.16    "Recycling rate" means the percentage of municipal waste 17that is generated in a county and that is to be composted or 18otherwise recycled each year. Until January 1, 2032, the 19recycling rate is 25%. Beginning January 1, 2032, the 20recycling rate is 50%.21(Source: P.A. 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 22    (415 ILCS 15/6)  (from Ch. 85, par. 5956)23    Sec. 6. Each county waste management plan adopted under 24Section 4 shall include a recycling program. Such recycling 25program:  HB4473- 3 -LRB104 15586 BDA 28753 b1    (1) shall be implemented throughout the county and include 2a time schedule for implementation of the program; .3    (2) shall provide for the designation of a recycling 4coordinator to administer the program; .5    (3) shall be designed to recycle or compost , by the end of 6the third and fifth years of the program, respectively 15% and 725% of the municipal waste generated in the county at the 8recycling rate described in Section 3, subject to the 9existence of a viable market for the recycled material, based 10on measurements of recycling and waste generated in terms of 11weight; the . The determination of recycling rate shall not 12include: discarded motor vehicles, wastes used for clean fill 13or erosion control, or commercial, institutional or industrial 14machinery or equipment; .15    (4) may provide for the construction and operation of one 16or more recycling centers by a unit of local government, or for 17contracting with other public or private entities for the 18operation of recycling centers; .19    (5) may require residents of the county to separate 20recyclable materials at the time of disposal or trash pick-up; 21.22    (6) may make special provision for commercial and 23institutional establishments that implement their own 24specialized recycling programs, provided that such 25establishments annually provide written documentation to the 26county of the total number of tons of material recycled; .  HB4473- 4 -LRB104 15586 BDA 28753 b1    (7) shall provide for separate collection and composting 2of leaves; .3    (8) shall include public education and notification 4programs to foster understanding of and encourage compliance 5with the recycling program; .6    (9) shall include provisions for compliance, including 7incentives and penalties; .8    (10) shall include provisions for (i) recycling the 9collected materials, (ii) identifying potential markets for at 10least 3 recyclable materials, and (iii) promoting the use of 11products made from recovered or recycled materials among 12businesses, newspapers and local governments in the county; .13    (11) may provide for the payment of recycling diversion 14credits to public and private parties engaged in recycling 15activities; and .16    (12) shall provide for the reduction of the total release 17of dioxin and mercury into the environment with the goal of 18their continued minimization and, if feasible, ultimate 19elimination from the county's municipal waste stream. 20(Source: P.A. 86-777; 87-650.)